ani_verbs_formation.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# VERBS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS
verb_forms
verb_forms[ptcp,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
verb_forms[ptcp,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
verb_forms[ptcp,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
verb_forms[ptcp,-pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]
verb_forms[ptcp,pl] [>:>] [<obl><m>:у] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
verb_forms[ptcp,pl] [>:>] [<obl><nm>:и] [>:>] Inflection[-m]

PATTERN verb_forms
Stems_with_Agr[irregular]
Stems_with_Agr[causative,-nasal] [>:>] [<caus>:олл] [>:>] ([<inf>:у] | npst_Declension | Imperative[-nasal,transitive] | still_not_present)
Stems_with_Agr[causative,nasal] [>:>] [<caus>:онн] [>:>] ([<inf>:у] | npst_Declension | Imperative[nasal,transitive] | still_not_present)
Stems_with_Agr[causative,-nasal] [>:>] [<caus>:олъ] [:и] pst_Declension[-intransitive,-nasal]
Stems_with_Agr[causative,nasal] [>:>] [<caus>:онлъ] [:и] pst_Declension[-intransitive,-nasal]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal] [>:>] ([<inf>:ери] | npst_Declension | still_not_present)
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,transitive] [>:>] Imperative[-nasal,transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-i] [<aor>:и] ([>:>] [<neg>:ссу])?
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-i,transitive] [:и] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-i,-transitive] [:и] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-o] [<aor>:о] ([>:>] [<neg>:ссу])?
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-o,transitive] [:о] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-o,-transitive] [:о] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-o,-transitive] [:о] [>:>] Imperative[-nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-u] [<aor>:у] ([>:>] [<neg>:ссу])?
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-u,transitive] [:у] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-u,-transitive] [:у] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-u,-transitive] [:у] [>:>] Imperative[-nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-a] [<aor>:а] ([>:>] [<neg>:ссу])?
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-a,transitive] [:а] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-a,-transitive] [:а] [>:>] pst_Declension[-nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,-nasal,thematic-a,-transitive] [:а] [>:>] Imperative[-nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,-npst-i,-npst-u] [<aor>:н] ([>:>] [<neg>:ссу])?
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,-npst-i,-npst-u] [:н] [>:>] pst_Declension[nasal]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,-npst-i,-npst-u,-transitive] [>:>] Imperative[nasal,-transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,-npst-i,-npst-u,transitive] [>:>] Imperative[nasal,transitive]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,-npst-i,-npst-u] [:нн] [>:>] ([<inf>:у] | npst_Declension)
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-i] [<aor>:он] ([>:>] [<neg>:ссу])?
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-i] [:он] [>:>] pst_Declension[nasal]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-i] [:о] [>:>] nasal_athematic_pst_Declension
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-i] [:инн] [>:>] npst_Declension
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-i,-transitive] [:о] [>:>] Imperative[nasal]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-i,transitive] [>:>] [<imp>:он]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-u] [<aor>:он] ([>:>] [<neg>:ссу])?
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-u] [:он] [>:>] pst_Declension[nasal]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-u] [:о] [>:>] nasal_athematic_pst_Declension
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-u] [:унн] [>:>] npst_Declension
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-u,-transitive] [:о] [>:>] Imperative[nasal]
Stems_with_Agr[-causative,nasal,npst-u,transitive] [>:>] [<imp>:он]


PATTERN Stems_with_Agr

Verb

agrCl [>:>] Verb_class_prefix

agrCl[m] [>:>] [:у] (Verb_class_prefix_i_a | Verb_class_prefix_i_o)
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [:и] (Verb_class_prefix_i_a | Verb_class_prefix_i_o)
agrCl[-jCl] [>:>] [:у] Verb_class_prefix_u_a
agrCl[jCl] [>:>] [:и] Verb_class_prefix_u_a
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:а] (Verb_class_prefix_i_a | Verb_class_prefix_u_a)
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:о] Verb_class_prefix_i_o

Verb_class_internal(1) :agrCl Verb_class_internal(2) [<V>:] agrCl:

agrCl[m] [>:>] [:у] Irregular_verbs[class_prefix_i_o]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [:и] Irregular_verbs[class_prefix_i_o]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [<pl>:о] Irregular_verbs[class_prefix_i_o]

Irregular_verbs[-class_prefix_i_o]

PATTERN still_not_present

[<hab>:е] [>:>] agrCl [>:>] [<snp>:агъий]
[<hab>:е] [>:>] agrCl [>:>] [<snp>:агъи] [>:>] [<pf>:й] [>:>] [<neg>:ссу]


LEXICON agrCl

<m>:в[m]
<f>:й[f,jCl]
<an><sg>:б[sg]
<an><pl>:й[pl,jCl]
<inan1>:б
<inan2>:р


LEXICON pst_Declension

<pf>:й
<pf>:ний[nasal]
<pf>><neg>:й>ссу
<pf>><neg>:ний>ссу[nasal]
<neg><cvb>:чIигу
<neg><cvb>:чIигу[nasal]
<prog>:р
<prog>:радо
<prog>:ралло
<prog>><neg>:р>ссу
<prog>><neg>:радо>ссу
<prog>><neg>:ралло>ссу
<rep>:доди
<pf>><rep>:й>гъоди
<opt>:до[intransitive]
<neg><opt>:ссу>до[intransitive]
<cond>:бор
<pf>><ctrf>:й>ламдур
<pf>><ctrf>:й>ламдури
<pf>><ctrf>:ний>ламдур[nasal]
<pf>><ctrf>:ний>ламдури[nasal]
<conc>:боло
<conc>:болло
<pfv><ptcp>:б[ptcp,pfv]
<pfv><ptcp>:ниб[nasal,ptcp,pfv]
<pfv><ptcp>><pl>:б>ул[ptcp,pl]
<pfv><ptcp>><pl>:ниб>ул[nasal,ptcp,pl]
<pfv><ptcp>><imm><conv>:б>лълъугу
<pfv><ptcp><temp>:рби
<pfv><ptcp><temp>:рбигьи
<pfv><ptcp><temp>:нирби[nasal]
<pfv><ptcp><temp>:нирбигьи[nasal]
<term><conv>:ло
<msd>:р
<msd>:нир[nasal]
<neg>><msd>:ссу>р
<neg>><msd>:ссу>р[nasal]


LEXICON nasal_athematic_pst_Declension
<prog>:мадо[nasal]
<prog>:малло[nasal]
<prog>><neg>:мадо>ссу[nasal]
<prog>><neg>:малло>ссу[nasal]
<conc>:моло[nasal]
<conc>:молло[nasal]
<msd>:н[nasal]
<cond>:мор[nasal]
<pfv><ptcp>:м[nasal,ptcp,pfv]
<pfv><ptcp>><pl>:м>ул[nasal,ptcp,pl]
<pfv><ptcp>><imm><conv>:м>лълъугу[nasal]


LEXICON npst_Declension

<hab>:е
<hab>><futimp>:е>хъо
<hab>><neg>><purp>:е>ссу>рий
<proh>:есхъо
<proh>><opt>:есхъо>до
<hab>><pref><cvb>:е>бди
<hab>><anter><cvb>:е>блълъирий
<fut>:ийа
<npst><ptcp>:ийа[ptcp]
<npst><ptcp>><pl>:ийа>л[ptcp,pl]
<neg><fut>:еcса


LEXICON Imperative

<imp>:о[transitive]
<imp>><opt>:о>до[transitive]
<imp>:б
<imp>:м[nasal]
<imp>><pl>:б>ул
<imp>><pl>:м>ул[nasal]


LEXICON Irregular_verbs
<cop>:джи[irregular]
<cop><neg>:ссу[irregular]
бигъи<V><aor>:гъи[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бигъи<V>><pf>:гъи>й[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бигъи<V>><inf>><neg>:гъе>ри>ссу[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бигъи<V>><neg>><inf>:гъе>ссу>ри[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V><aor>:кIо[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><pfv><ptcp>:кIо>б[class_prefix_i_o,irregular,ptcp]
бикIвери<V>><pfv><ptcp>><pl>:кIо>б>ул[class_prefix_i_o,irregular,ptcp,pl]
бикIвери<V>><prog>:кIо>радо[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><imp>:кIо>б[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><inf>:кIв>ери[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><inf>:кIв>ери[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><inf>><neg>:кIв>ери>ссу[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><neg>><inf>:кIве>ссу>ри[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><hab>:кIв>е[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><fut>:кIу>йа[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><neg><fut>:кIве>сса[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]
бикIвери<V>><caus>><inf>:кIв>олл>у[class_prefix_i_o,irregular]


LEXICON Inflection

<gen>:лIи[nm]
<gen><pl>:лI>ол[nm]
<dat>:лъу[n.m.sg]
<erg>:ди
<dat>:й[vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>:в[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><sg>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>:р[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>><pl>:в>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>><pl>:б>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>><pl>:р>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<aff><m>:во[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><f>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><sg>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><pl>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan1>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan2>:ро[vowel_morpheme]
<sub><ess>:кьи
<sub><lat>:кьи
<sub>><el>:кьи>кку
<super><ess>:ъа
<super><lat>:ъо
<super>><el>:ъа>кку
<in><ess>:ла
<in><lat>:ди
<in>><el>:ла>кку
<inter><ess>:лIи
<inter><lat>:лIи
<inter>><el>:лIи>кку
<ad><ess>:ха
<ad><lat>:хо
<ad>><el>:хо>кку
<apud><ess>:хъи
<apud><lat>:хъи
<apud>><el>:хъи>кку
<cont><ess>:чIу
<cont><lat>:чIу
<cont>><el>:чIу>кку
